Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2 Hotels and Motels

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hotels, Charitable Events & REAP, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, Subject 560-2-11.

3-9-10.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Hotel” means any hotel, inn, or other establishment which offers overnight accommodations to the public for hire.

“In-room service” means:

The delivery of alcoholic beverages by an employee of the hotel to a registered guest’s room or to a registered guest at any other location in the same building as the hotel when such alcoholic beverages have been ordered by the guest and when the guest shall be billed for the cost of such alcoholic beverages at the time of delivery and when the sale of such alcoholic beverages is completed at the time of delivery; and

The provision of a cabinet or other facility located in a hotel’s guest room which contains alcoholic beverages and which is provided upon written request of the guest and which is accessible by lock and key only to the guest and for which the sale of the alcoholic beverages contained therein is deemed to be final at the time requested except for a credit which may be given to the guest for any unused portion.

“Registered guest” means the lessor or tenant of one or more hotel rooms; the lessor, tenant, or owner of a condominium unit located in the same building as one or more hotel rooms; or the lessor, owner, or tenant of a commercial space located in the same building as one or more hotel rooms, provided that the name of such lessor, owner, or tenant appears on a guest registry maintained by the hotel.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-9-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 778, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 553, § 4; Ga. L. 1997, p. 483, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 391, § 2/HB 392.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 4, 2021, deleted “in unbroken packages” following “alcoholic beverages” near the beginning of subparagraph (2)(A).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, in subparagraph (2)(B) “beverages” was substituted for “beverage” the first time the former appears.

3-9-11.
Licenses for in-room service.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this title or any other law, in any county or municipality in which the sale of alcoholic beverages either by the package or by the drink is authorized, the commissioner may authorize any hotel which is licensed to sell alcoholic beverages either by the package or by the drink or any hotel which is licensed to sell alcoholic beverages both by the package and by the drink to provide in-room service.

No hotel shall be authorized to provide in-room service until it has been issued a license to do so by the commissioner. A license fee of $100.00 shall be imposed to provide alcoholic beverages by in-room service, except that a license fee of $50.00 shall be imposed to provide only beer or wine by in-room service.

The sale of alcoholic beverages by in-room service shall be subject to all restrictions and limitations in this title relative to the sale of alcoholic beverages, except as provided otherwise in this article, and shall be authorized only on such days and only during such hours as the sale of alcoholic beverages is otherwise authorized in the county or municipality.

Distilled spirits sold by the package pursuant to this article shall not be sold in packages containing less than 50 milliliters each.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-9-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 778, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 553, § 5; Ga. L. 2021, p. 391, § 3/HB 392.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 4, 2021, inserted “by the package” near the beginning of subsection (d).

3-9-12.
Source of beverages sold; taxes.

All alcoholic beverages sold pursuant to this article shall be subject to all state and local taxes imposed on alcoholic beverages and shall be purchased from a licensed wholesaler.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-9-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 778, § 1.

3-9-13.
In-room service sales in dry areas prohibited.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages through in-room service in any county or municipality in which the sale of alcoholic beverages both by the package and by the drink is prohibited.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-9-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 778, § 1.